dev/mt_wiktionary/nounNoNumber.all.fat.dix
  <!-- qawsalla; qawsalla; 1 -->
    <pardef n="qawsalla__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kokroċ; kokroċ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="kokroċ__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kokroċ; kokroċ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="kokroċ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- riħ_stellari; riħ_stellari; 1 -->
    <pardef n="riħ_stellari__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Daniżi; Daniżi; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Daniżi__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- żmien; żmien; 1 -->
    <pardef n="żmien__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- żmien; żmien; 1 -->
    <pardef n="żmien__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġurdien; ġurdien; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ġurdien__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġurdien; ġurdien; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ġurdien__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kowt; kowt; 1 -->
    <pardef n="kowt__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- enerġija; enerġija; 1 -->
    <pardef n="enerġija__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- varjazzjoni; varjazzjoni; 1 -->
    <pardef n="varjazzjoni__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- fażolla; fażolla; 1 -->
    <pardef n="fażolla__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- fażolla; fażolla; 1 -->
    <pardef n="fażolla__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- lingwa; lingwa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="lingwa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- superstizzjoni; superstizzjoni; 1 -->
    <pardef n="superstizzjoni__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- jiskomoda; jiskomoda; 1 -->
    <pardef n="jiskomoda__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- bejt; bejt; 1 -->
    <pardef n="bejt__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- bejt; bejt; 1 -->
    <pardef n="bejt__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġenerazzjoni; ġenerazzjoni; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ġenerazzjoni__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħuta; ħuta; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ħuta__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tobba; tobba; 1 -->
    <pardef n="tobba__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- żarbuna; żarbuna; 1 -->
    <pardef n="żarbuna__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- xkupilja_tax-xagħar; xkupilja_tax-xagħar; 1 -->
    <pardef n="xkupilja_tax-xagħar__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċrieki; ċrieki; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ċrieki__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġemel; ġemel; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ġemel__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġemel; ġemel; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ġemel__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- missier; missier; 1 -->
    <pardef n="missier__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- missier; missier; 1 -->
    <pardef n="missier__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ngħalla; ngħalla; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ngħalla__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ngħalla; ngħalla; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ngħalla__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tentazzjoni; tentazzjoni; 1 -->
    <pardef n="tentazzjoni__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- difer; difer; 1 -->
    <pardef n="difer__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- difer; difer; 1 -->
    <pardef n="difer__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- anġlu; anġlu; 1 -->
    <pardef n="anġlu__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tifla; tifla; 1 -->
    <pardef n="tifla__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tifla; tifla; 1 -->
    <pardef n="tifla__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- psikoloġija; psikoloġija; 1 -->
    <pardef n="psikoloġija__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Tedeska; Tedeska; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Tedeska__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- bieb; bieb; 1 -->
    <pardef n="bieb__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- spiżjara; spiżjara; 1 -->
    <pardef n="spiżjara__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- lejla; lejla; 1 -->
    <pardef n="lejla__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="qawsalla"><i>qawsalla</i><par n="qawsalla__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kokroċ"><i>kokroċ</i><par n="kokroċ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kokroċ"><i>kokroċ</i><par n="kokroċ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="riħ_stellari"><i>riħ_stellari</i><par n="riħ_stellari__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Daniżi"><i>Daniżi</i><par n="Daniżi__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żmien"><i>żmien</i><par n="żmien__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żmien"><i>żmien</i><par n="żmien__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ġurdien"><i>ġurdien</i><par n="ġurdien__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġurdien"><i>ġurdien</i><par n="ġurdien__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kowt"><i>kowt</i><par n="kowt__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="enerġija"><i>enerġija</i><par n="enerġija__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="varjazzjoni"><i>varjazzjoni</i><par n="varjazzjoni__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="fażolla"><i>fażolla</i><par n="fażolla__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="fażolla"><i>fażolla</i><par n="fażolla__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lingwa"><i>lingwa</i><par n="lingwa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="superstizzjoni"><i>superstizzjoni</i><par n="superstizzjoni__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="jiskomoda"><i>jiskomoda</i><par n="jiskomoda__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bejt"><i>bejt</i><par n="bejt__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bejt"><i>bejt</i><par n="bejt__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ġenerazzjoni"><i>ġenerazzjoni</i><par n="ġenerazzjoni__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħuta"><i>ħuta</i><par n="ħuta__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="tobba"><i>tobba</i><par n="tobba__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żarbuna"><i>żarbuna</i><par n="żarbuna__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="xkupilja_tax-xagħar"><i>xkupilja_tax-xagħar</i><par n="xkupilja_tax-xagħar__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ċrieki"><i>ċrieki</i><par n="ċrieki__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġemel"><i>ġemel</i><par n="ġemel__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġemel"><i>ġemel</i><par n="ġemel__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="missier"><i>missier</i><par n="missier__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="missier"><i>missier</i><par n="missier__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ngħalla"><i>ngħalla</i><par n="ngħalla__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ngħalla"><i>ngħalla</i><par n="ngħalla__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tentazzjoni"><i>tentazzjoni</i><par n="tentazzjoni__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="difer"><i>difer</i><par n="difer__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="difer"><i>difer</i><par n="difer__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="anġlu"><i>anġlu</i><par n="anġlu__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tifla"><i>tifla</i><par n="tifla__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="tifla"><i>tifla</i><par n="tifla__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="psikoloġija"><i>psikoloġija</i><par n="psikoloġija__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Tedeska"><i>Tedeska</i><par n="Tedeska__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bieb"><i>bieb</i><par n="bieb__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="spiżjara"><i>spiżjara</i><par n="spiżjara__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lejla"><i>lejla</i><par n="lejla__n_f"/></e>
